Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 71
LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGES

Section

PART 1 LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGES - ORGANIZATION

PART 2 LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGES -
STATE SYSTEM

PART 3 DIRECT GRANTS TO
LOCAL COLLEGE DISTRICTS

PART 4 TAX LEVIES AND REVENUES

PART 5 BONDED INDEBTEDNESS

PART 6 REFUNDING BONDS

PART 7 LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGES - REVENUE SECURITIES LAW